District of Columbia statutes.
31-408

Penalties.

(a)

(1)

If the Mayor believes that the controlling producer or any other person has not materially complied with this chapter, or any regulation or order promulgated hereunder, after notice and opportunity to be heard, the Commissioner may order the controlling producer to cease placing business with the controlled insurer; and

(2)

If it was found that because of material noncompliance the controlled insurer or any policyholder has suffered any loss or damage, the Mayor may maintain a civil action or intervene in an action brought by or on behalf of the insurer or policyholder for recovery of compensatory damages for the benefit of the insurer or policyholder or for other appropriate relief.

(b)

If an order for liquidation or rehabilitation of the controlled insurer has been entered pursuant to Chapter 13 of this title, and the receiver appointed under that order believes that the controlling producer, or any other person, has not materially complied with this chapter, or any regulation or order promulgated hereunder, and the insurer suffered any loss or damage therefrom, the receiver may maintain a civil action for recovery of damages or other appropriate sanctions for the benefit of the insurer.

(c)

Nothing contained in this section shall affect the right of the Mayor to impose any other penalties provided under the insurance laws of the District of Columbia.

(d)

Nothing contained in this section shall in any manner alter or affect the rights of policyholders, claimants, creditors, or other third parties.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-52, § 9, 40 DCR 6129
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10, 44 DCR 1730
1981 Ed., § 35-4008.